Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2023.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 5618YH (3) 91 th/ns H.F. 2023 Section 1. Section 321.285, subsection 2, paragraph a, 1 subparagraphs (1) and (2), Code 2026, are amended to read as 2 follows: 3 (1) Twenty miles per hour in any a business district or 4 school district . 5 (2) Twenty-five miles per hour in any a residence or school 6 district. 7 Sec. 2. Section 805.8A, subsection 5, paragraph a, 8 subparagraph (5), Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 9 (5) One Two hundred thirty-five eighty-five dollars plus 10 five dollars for each mile per hour of excessive speed over 11 twenty miles per hour over the limit. 12 Sec. 3. IMPLEMENTATION. Notwithstanding section 321.252, 13 321.255, 321.285, or any other provision of law to the 14 contrary, when updating speed limit signs as a result of the 15 enactment of this Act, a county or city, as applicable, may 16 attach nonpermanent overlays or stickers approved by the 17 department of transportation to existing speed limit signs 18 in order to display the new speed limit. The nonpermanent 19 overlays or stickers may be used until the applicable 20 speed limit sign is replaced based on the countyâs or 21 cityâs respective replacement schedule and any applicable 22 specifications or requirements. 23